Hawaii statutes.
[§487N-4] Reporting requirements. A
government agency shall submit a written report to the legislature within
twenty days after discovery of a security breach at the government agency that
details information relating to the nature of the breach, the number of
individuals affected by the breach, a copy of the notice of security breach
that was issued, the number of individuals to whom the notice was sent, whether
the notice was delayed due to law enforcement considerations, and any
procedures that have been implemented to prevent the breach from reoccurring.
In the event that a law enforcement agency informs the government agency that
notification may impede a criminal investigation or jeopardize national
security, the report to the legislature may be delayed until twenty days after
the law enforcement agency has determined that notice will no longer impede the
investigation or jeopardize national security. [L 2006, c 135, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next